California statutes. Penal Code
It shall be the duty of the judge or magistrate to file with the clerk of the court, within 24 hours after presentation to him or her, all affidavits for the justification of bail, by delivering or mailing them to the clerk of the court. Certified copies of the affidavits for justification of bail involving equity in real property may upon the written order of the judge or magistrate be recorded with the county recorder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 676, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1280.1.

(a) From the time of recording an affidavit for the justification of bail, the affidavit shall constitute an attachment lien governed by Sections 488.500, 488.510 and 489.310 of the Code of Civil Procedure in the amount of the bail undertaking, until exonerated, released, or otherwise discharged. Any release of the undertaking shall be effected by an order of the court, filed with the clerk of the court, with a certified copy of the order recorded in the office of the county recorder.

(b) If the bail is forfeited and summary judgment is entered, pursuant to Sections 1305 and 1306, the lien shall have the force and effect of a judgment lien, by recordation of an abstract of judgment, which, may be enforced and satisfied pursuant to Section 1306 as well as through the applicable execution process set forth in Title 9 (commencing with Section 680.010) of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 854, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1281.

Upon the allowance of bail and the execution and approval of the undertaking, the magistrate must, if the defendant is in custody, make and sign an order for his discharge, upon the delivery of which to the proper officer the defendant must be discharged.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1927, Ch. 733.)
-------------------------------------------

1281a.

A judge of the superior court within the county, wherein a cause is pending against any person charged with a felony, may justify and approve bail in the said cause, and may execute an order for the release of the defendant which shall authorize the discharge of the defendant by any officer having said defendant in custody.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 552.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Bail Upon an Indictment Before Conviction [1284. - 1289.]

1284.

When the offense charged is not punishable with death, the officer serving the bench warrant must, if required, take the defendant before a magistrate in the county in which it is issued, or in which he is arrested, for the purpose of giving bail. If the defendant appears before such magistrate without the bench warrant having been served upon him, the magistrate shall deliver him into the custody of the sheriff for the purpose of immediate booking and the recording of identification data, whereupon the sheriff shall deliver the defendant back before the magistrate for the purpose of giving bail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2198.)
-------------------------------------------

1285.

If the offense charged is punishable with death, the officer arresting the defendant must deliver him into custody, according to the command of the bench warrant.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1880, Ch. 47.)
-------------------------------------------

1286.

When the defendant is so delivered into custody he must be held by the Sheriff, unless admitted to bail on examination upon a writ of habeas corpus.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1287.

(a) The bail shall be put in by a written undertaking, executed by two sufficient sureties (with or without the defendant, in the discretion of the court or magistrate), and acknowledged before the court or magistrate, in substantially the following form:

An indictment having been found on the ____ day of ____, 20__, in the Superior Court of the County of ____, charging ____ with the crime of ____ (designating it generally) and he or she having been admitted to bail in the sum of ____ dollars ($____), we, ____ and ____, of ____ (stating their place of residence and occupation), hereby undertake that the above-named ____ will appear and answer any charge in any accusatory pleading based upon the acts supporting the indictment above mentioned, in whatever court it may be prosecuted, and will at all times render himself or herself amenable to the orders and process of the court, and, if convicted, will appear for pronouncement of judgment or grant of probation; or, if he or she fails to perform either of these conditions, that we will pay to the people of the State of California the sum of ____ dollars ($____) (inserting the sum in which the defendant is admitted to bail). If the forfeiture of this bond be ordered by the court, judgment may be summarily made and entered forthwith against the said (naming the sureties, and the defendant if he or she be a party to the bond), for the amount of their respective undertakings herein, as provided by Sections 1305 and 1306.

(b) Every undertaking of bail shall contain the bail agent license number of the owner of the bail agency issuing the undertaking along with the name, address, and phone number of the agency, regardless of whether the owner is an individual, partnership, or corporation. The bail agency name on the undertaking shall be a business name approved by the Insurance Commissioner for use by the bail agency owner, and be so reflected in the public records of the commissioner. The license number of the bail agent appearing on the undertaking shall be in the same type size as the name, address, and phone number of the agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 104, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1288.

The provisions contained in sections 1279, 1280, 1280a and 1281, in relation to bail before indictment, apply to bail after indictment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1927, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

1289.

After a defendant has been admitted to bail upon an indictment or information, the Court in which the charge is pending may, upon good cause shown, either increase or reduce the amount of bail. If the amount be increased, the Court may order the defendant to be committed to actual custody, unless he give bail in such increased amount. If application be made by the defendant for a reduction of the amount, notice of the application must be served upon the District Attorney.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1880, Ch. 47.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Bail on Appeal [1291. - 1292.]

1291.

In the cases in which defendant may be admitted to bail upon an appeal, the order admitting him to bail may be made by any Magistrate having the power to issue a writ of habeas corpus, or by the Magistrate before whom the trial was had.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1877-78, Ch. 89.)
-------------------------------------------

1292.

The bail must possess the qualifications, and must be put in, in all respects, as provided in Article II of this Chapter, except that the undertaking must be conditioned as prescribed in Section 1273, for undertakings of bail on appeal.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Deposit Instead of Bail [1295. - 1298.]

1295.

(a) The defendant, or any other person, at any time after an order admitting defendant to bail or after the arrest and booking of a defendant for having committed a misdemeanor, instead of giving bail may deposit, with the clerk of the court in which the defendant is held to answer or notified to appear for arraignment, the sum mentioned in the order or, if no order, in the schedule of bail previously fixed by the judges of the court, and, upon delivering to the officer in whose custody defendant is a certificate of the deposit, the defendant must be discharged from custody.

(b) Where more than one deposit is made with respect to any charge in any accusatory pleading based upon the acts supporting the original charge as a result of which an earlier deposit was made, the defendant shall receive credit in the amount of any earlier deposit.

(c) The clerk of the court shall not accept a general assistance check for this deposit or any part thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 17, Sec. 104.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1296.

If the defendant has given bail, he may, at any time before the forfeiture of the undertaking, in like manner deposit the sum mentioned in the recognizance, and upon the deposit being made the bail is exonerated.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.

When money has been deposited, a receipt shall be issued in the name of the depositor. If the money remains on deposit at the time of a judgment for the payment of a fine, the clerk shall, under the direction of the court, if the defendant be the depositor, apply the money in satisfaction thereof, and after satisfying restitution to the victim or the Restitution Fund, fines, and costs, shall refund the surplus, if any, to the defendant. If the person to whom the receipt for the deposit was issued was not the defendant, the deposit after judgment shall be returned to that person within 10 days after the person claims it by submitting the receipt, and, if a claim is not made within 10 days of the exoneration of bail, the clerk shall immediately notify the depositor of the exoneration of bail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 313, Sec. 11.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1298.

In lieu of a deposit of money, the defendant or any other person may deposit bonds of the United States or of the State of California of the face value of the cash deposit required, and these bonds shall be treated in the same manner as a deposit of money or the defendant or any other person may give as security any equity in real property which he or she owns, provided that no charge is made to the defendant or any other person for the giving as security of any equity in real property. A hearing, at which witnesses may be called or examined, shall be held before the magistrate to determine the value of the equity and if the magistrate finds that the value of the equity is equal to twice the amount of the cash deposit required he or she shall allow the bail. The clerk shall, under order of the court, when occasion arises therefor, sell the bonds or the equity and apply the proceeds of the sale in the manner that a deposit of cash may be required to be applied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 699, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Bail Fugitive Recovery Persons Act [1299. - 1299.12.]

1299.

This article shall be known as the Bail Fugitive Recovery Persons Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 747, Sec. 1.   (AB 2029)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1299.01.

(a) For purposes of this article, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1) “Bail fugitive” means a defendant in a pending criminal case who has been released from custody under a financially secured appearance, cash, or other bond and has had that bond declared forfeited, or a defendant in a pending criminal case who has violated a bond condition whereby apprehension and reincarceration are permitted.

(2) “Bail” means a bail agent, bail permittee, or bail solicitor licensed by the Department of Insurance pursuant to Section 1802, 1802.5, or 1803 of the Insurance Code.

(3) “Depositor of bail” means a person who or entity that has deposited money or bonds to secure the release of a person charged with a crime or offense.

(4) “Bail fugitive recovery agent” means a person licensed pursuant to Section 1802.3 of the Insurance Code who is provided written authorization pursuant to Section 1300 or 1301 by the bail or depositor of bail, and is contracted to investigate, surveil, locate, and arrest a bail fugitive for surrender to the appropriate court, jail, or police department, and any person who is employed to assist a bail or depositor of bail to investigate, surveil, locate, and arrest a bail fugitive for surrender to the appropriate court, jail, or police department.

(b) This section
 shall become operative on July 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 18) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 768, Sec. 19.   (AB 2043)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1299.02.

(a) No person, other than a certified law enforcement officer, shall be authorized to apprehend, detain, or arrest a bail fugitive unless that person meets one of the following conditions:

(1) Is a bail as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1299.01 who is also a bail fugitive recovery agent as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 1299.01.

(2) Is a bail fugitive recovery agent as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 1299.01.

(3) Is a licensed private investigator as provided in Chapter 11.3 (commencing with Section 7512) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code who is also a bail fugitive recovery agent as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 1299.01.

(b) This article
 shall not prohibit an arrest pursuant to Sections 837, 838, and 839, provided that no consideration is paid or allowed, directly or indirectly, to any person effecting an arrest pursuant to Sections 837, 838, and 839.

(c) Individuals who hold a bail license, bail fugitive recovery license, bail enforcer license, bail runner license, or private investigator license issued by another state shall not apprehend, detain, or arrest bail fugitives in California, unless that individual obtains a bail fugitive recovery agent license issued in this state and complies with California law.

(d) A person authorized, pursuant to subdivision (a), to apprehend, detain, or arrest a bail fugitive shall not apprehend, detain, or arrest a bail fugitive admitted to bail in another state whose alleged offense or conviction was for the violation of the laws of another state that authorize a
 criminal penalty to an individual performing, receiving, supporting, or aiding in the performance or receipt of sexual or reproductive health care, including, but not limited to, an abortion, contraception, or gender-affirming care if the sexual or reproductive health care is lawful under the laws of this state, regardless of the recipient’s location. A person who violates this subdivision is guilty of an infraction punishable by a fine of five thousand dollars ($5,000), is ineligible for a license issued pursuant to Chapter 11.3 (commencing with Section 7512) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code or Section 1800 of the Insurance Code, and shall forfeit any license already obtained pursuant to those laws. A person who is taken into custody by a bail agent in violation of this subdivision may institute and prosecute a civil action for injunctive, monetary, or other appropriate relief against the bail fugitive recovery agent within three years after the cause of action accrues.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2023.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 260, Sec. 16.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1299.04.

(a) A bail fugitive recovery agent, bail agent, bail permittee, or bail solicitor who contracts their services to another bail agent or surety as a bail fugitive recovery agent for the purposes specified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 1299.01, and any bail agent, bail permittee, or bail solicitor who obtains licensing after January 1, 2000, and who engages in the arrest of a defendant pursuant to Section 1301 shall comply with Sections 1800 to 1823, inclusive, of the Insurance Code, and any regulations promulgated by the Insurance Commissioner.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 22) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 768, Sec. 23.   (AB 2043)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1299.05.

In performing a bail fugitive apprehension, an individual authorized by Section 1299.02 to apprehend a bail fugitive shall comply with all laws applicable to that apprehension.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 747, Sec. 1.   (AB 2029)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1299.06.

Before apprehending a bail fugitive, an individual authorized by Section 1299.02 to apprehend a bail fugitive shall have in his or her possession proper documentation of authority to apprehend issued by the bail or depositor of bail as prescribed in Sections 1300 and 1301. The authority to apprehend document shall include all of the following information: the name of the individual authorized by Section 1299.02 to apprehend a bail fugitive and any fictitious name, if applicable; the address of the principal office of the individual authorized by Section 1299.02 to apprehend a bail fugitive; and the name and principal business address of the bail agency, surety company, or other party contracting with the individual authorized by Section 1299.02 to apprehend a bail
 fugitive.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 747, Sec. 1.   (AB 2029)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1299.07.

(a) An individual authorized by Section 1299.02 to apprehend a bail fugitive shall not represent themselves in any manner as being a sworn law enforcement officer.

(b) An individual authorized by Section 1299.02 to apprehend a bail fugitive shall not wear any uniform that represents themselves as belonging to any part or department of a federal, state, or local government. Any uniform shall not display the words United States, Bureau, Task Force, Federal, or other substantially similar words that a reasonable person may mistake for a government agency.

(c) An individual authorized by Section 1299.02 to apprehend a bail
 fugitive shall not wear or otherwise use a badge that represents themselves as belonging to any part or department of the federal, state, or local government.

(d) An individual authorized by Section 1299.02 to apprehend a bail fugitive shall not use a fictitious name that represents themselves as belonging to any federal, state, or local government.

(e) An individual authorized by Section 1299.02 to apprehend a bail fugitive may wear a jacket, shirt, or vest with the words “BAIL BOND RECOVERY AGENT,” “BAIL ENFORCEMENT,” or “BAIL ENFORCEMENT AGENT” displayed in letters at least two inches high across the front or back of the jacket, shirt, or vest and in a contrasting color to that of the jacket, shirt, or vest.

(f) An
 individual authorized by Section 1299.02 to apprehend a bail fugitive shall not use that position for the purposes of immigration enforcement, except pursuant to a valid judicial warrant or court order.

(g) An individual authorized by Section 1299.02 to apprehend a bail fugitive shall not disclose or provide in writing, verbally, or in any other manner, personally identifiable information of any bail fugitive that is requested for purposes of immigration enforcement, except pursuant to a valid judicial warrant or court order.

(h) For purposes of this section, immigration enforcement includes any and all efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal civil immigration law, and also includes any and all efforts to
 investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal criminal immigration law that penalizes a person’s presence in, entry or reentry to, or employment in, the United States.

(i) This section does not prohibit or restrict any governmental entity or official from sending to, or receiving from, federal immigration authorities, information regarding the citizenship or immigration status, lawful or unlawful, of an individual, or from requesting from federal immigration authorities immigration status information, lawful or unlawful, of any individual, or maintaining or exchanging that information with any other federal, state, or local governmental entity, pursuant to Sections 1373 and 1644 of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 126, Sec. 8.   (SB 805)   Effective September 20, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1299.08.

(a) Except under exigent circumstances, an individual authorized by Section 1299.02 to apprehend a bail fugitive shall, prior to and no more than six hours before attempting to apprehend the bail fugitive, notify the local police department or sheriff’s department of the intent to apprehend a bail fugitive in that jurisdiction by doing all of the following:

(1) Indicating the name of an individual authorized by Section 1299.02 to apprehend a bail fugitive entering the jurisdiction.

(2) Stating the approximate time an individual authorized by Section 1299.02 to apprehend a bail fugitive will be entering the jurisdiction and the
 approximate length of the stay.

(3) Stating the name and approximate location of the bail fugitive.

(b) If an exigent circumstance does arise and prior notification is not given as provided in subdivision (a), an individual authorized by Section 1299.02 to apprehend a bail fugitive shall notify the local police department or sheriff’s department immediately after the apprehension, and upon request of the local jurisdiction, shall submit a detailed explanation of those exigent circumstances within three working days after the apprehension is made.

(c) This section shall not preclude an individual authorized by Section 1299.02 to apprehend a bail fugitive from making or attempting to make a lawful arrest of a bail fugitive on bond pursuant to Section 1300 or 1301. The fact that a bench warrant is not located or entered
 into a warrant depository or system shall not affect a lawful arrest of the bail fugitive.

(d) For the purposes of this section, notice may be provided to a local law enforcement agency by telephone prior to the arrest or, after the arrest has taken place, if exigent circumstances exist. In that case the name or operator number of the employee receiving the notice information shall be obtained and retained by the bail, depositor of bail, or bail fugitive recovery person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 747, Sec. 1.   (AB 2029)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1299.09.

An individual, authorized by Section 1299.02 to apprehend a bail fugitive shall not forcibly enter a premises except as provided for in Section 844.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 747, Sec. 1.   (AB 2029)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1299.10.

An individual authorized by Section 1299.02 to apprehend a bail fugitive shall not carry a firearm or other weapon unless in compliance with the laws of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 747, Sec. 1.   (AB 2029)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1299.11.

Any person who violates this act, or who conspires with another person to violate this act, or who hires an individual to apprehend a bail fugitive, knowing that the individual is not authorized by Section 1299.02 to apprehend a bail fugitive, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 747, Sec. 1.   (AB 2029)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1299.12.

Nothing in this article is intended to exempt from licensure persons otherwise required to be licensed as private investigators pursuant to Chapter 11.3 (commencing with Section 7512) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 747, Sec. 1.   (AB 2029)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Exoneration [1300. - 1304.]

1300.

(a) At any time before the forfeiture of their undertaking, or deposit by a third person, the bail or the depositor may surrender the defendant in their exoneration, or he may surrender himself, to the officer to whose custody he was committed at the time of giving bail, in the following manner:

(1) A certified copy of the undertaking of the bail, a certified copy of the certificate of deposit where a deposit is made, or an affidavit given by the bail licensee or surety company listing all that specific information that would be included on a certified copy of an undertaking of bail, must be delivered to the officer who must detain the defendant in his custody thereon as upon a commitment, and by a certificate in writing acknowledge the surrender.

(2) The bail or depositor, upon surrendering the defendant, shall make reasonable effort to give notice to the defendant’s last attorney of record, if any, of such surrender.

(3) The officer to whom the defendant is surrendered shall, within 48 hours of the surrender, bring the defendant before the court in which the defendant is next to appear on the case for which he has been surrendered. The court shall advise the defendant of his right to move the court for an order permitting the withdrawal of any previous waiver of time and shall advise him of the authority of the court, as provided in subdivision (b), to order return of the premium paid by the defendant or other person, or any part of it.

(4) Upon the undertaking, or certificate of deposit, and the certificate of the officer, the court in which the action or appeal is pending may, upon notice of five days to the district attorney of the county, with a copy of the undertaking, or certificate of deposit, and the certificate of the officer, order that the bail or deposit be exonerated. However, if the defendant is released on his own recognizance or on another bond before the issuance of such an order, the court shall order that the bail or deposit be exonerated without prejudice to the court’s authority under subdivision (b). On filing the order and papers used on the application, they are exonerated accordingly.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if the court determines that good cause does not exist for the surrender of a defendant who has not failed to appear or has not violated any order of the court, it may, in its discretion, order the bail or the depositor to return to the defendant or other person who has paid the premium or any part of it, all of the money so paid or any part of it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 223, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1301.

For the purpose of surrendering the defendant, the bail or any person who has deposited money or bonds to secure the release of the defendant, at any time before such bail or other person is finally discharged, and at any place within the state, may himself arrest defendant, or by written authority indorsed on a certified copy of the undertaking or a certified copy of the certificate of deposit, may empower any person of suitable age to do so.

Any bail or other person who so arrests a defendant in this state shall, without unnecessary delay, and, in any event, within 48 hours of the arrest, deliver the defendant to the court or magistrate before whom the defendant is required to appear or to the custody of the sheriff or police for confinement in the appropriate jail in the county or city in which defendant is required to appear. Any bail or other person who arrests a defendant outside this state shall, without unnecessary delay after the time defendant is brought into this state, and, in any event, within 48 hours after defendant is brought into this state, deliver the defendant to the custody of the court or magistrate before whom the defendant is required to appear or to the custody of the sheriff or police for confinement in the appropriate jail in the county or city in which defendant is required to appear.

Any bail or other person who willfully fails to deliver a defendant to the court, magistrate, sheriff, or police as required by this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

The provisions of this section relating to the time of delivery of a defendant are for his benefit and, with the consent of the bail, may be waived by him. To be valid, such waiver shall be in writing, signed by the defendant, and delivered to such bail or other person within 48 hours after the defendant’s arrest or entry into this state, as the case may be. The defendant, at any time and in the same manner, may revoke said waiver. Whereupon, he shall be delivered as provided herein without unnecessary delay and, in any event within 48 hours from the time of such revocation.

If any 48-hour period specified in this section terminates on a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday, delivery of a defendant by a bail or other person to the court or magistrate or to the custody of the sheriff or police may, without violating this section, take place before noon on the next day following which is not a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1859.)
-------------------------------------------

1302.

If money has been deposited instead of bail, and the defendant, at any time before the forfeiture thereof, surrenders himself or herself to the officer to whom the commitment was directed, in the manner provided in Sections 1300 and 1301, the court shall order a return of the deposit to the defendant or to the person or persons found by the court to have deposited said money on behalf of the defendant, upon the production of the certificate of the officer showing the surrender, and upon a notice of five days to the district attorney, with a copy of the certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 84.)
-------------------------------------------

1303.

If an action or proceeding against a defendant who has been admitted to bail is dismissed, the bail shall not be exonerated until a period of 15 days has elapsed since the entry of the order of dismissal. If, within such period, the defendant is arrested and charged with a public offense arising out of the same act or omission upon which the action or proceeding was based, the bail shall be applied to the public offense. If an undertaking of bail is on file, the clerk of the court shall promptly mail notice to the surety on the bond and the bail agent who posted the bond whenever the bail is applied to a public offense pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1790.)
-------------------------------------------

1304.

Any bail, or moneys or bonds deposited in lieu of bail, or any equity in real property as security in lieu of bail, or any agreement whereby the defendant is released on his or her own recognizance shall be exonerated two years from the effective date of the initial bond, provided that the court is informed in writing at least 60 days prior to 2 years after the initial bond of the fact that the bond is to be exonerated, or unless the court determines otherwise and informs the party executing the bail of the reasons that the bail is not exonerated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 284, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Forfeiture of the Undertaking of Bail or of the Deposit of Money [1305. - 1308.]

1305.

(a) (1) A court shall in open court declare forfeited the undertaking of bail or the money or property deposited as bail if, without sufficient excuse, a defendant fails to appear for any of the following:

(A) Arraignment.

(B) Trial.

(C) Judgment.

(D) Any other occasion prior to the pronouncement of judgment if the defendant’s presence in court is lawfully required.

(E) To surrender himself or herself in execution of the judgment after appeal.

 (2) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), except as provided in subparagraph (B), the court shall not have jurisdiction to declare a forfeiture and the bail shall be released of all obligations under the bond if the case is dismissed or if no complaint is filed within 15 days from the date of arraignment.

(B) The court’s jurisdiction to declare a forfeiture and authority to release bail may be extended for not more than 90 days from the arraignment date originally set by the jailer pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1269b if either of the following occur:

(i) The prosecutor requests in writing or in open court that the arraignment be continued to allow the prosecutor time to file the complaint.

(ii) The defendant requests the
 extension in writing or in open court.

(b) (1) If the amount of the bond or money or property deposited exceeds four hundred dollars ($400), the clerk of the court shall, within 30 days of the forfeiture, mail notice of the forfeiture to the surety or the depositor of money posted instead of bail. At the same time, the court shall mail a copy of the forfeiture notice to the bail agent whose name appears on the bond. The clerk shall also execute a certificate of mailing of the forfeiture notice and shall place the certificate in the court’s file. If the notice of forfeiture is required to be mailed pursuant to this section, the 180-day period provided for in this section shall be extended by a period of five days to allow for the mailing.

(2) If the surety is an authorized corporate surety, and if the bond plainly displays the mailing address of the corporate
 surety and the bail agent, then notice of the forfeiture shall be mailed to the surety at that address and to the bail agent, and mailing alone to the surety or the bail agent shall not constitute compliance with this section.

(3) The surety or depositor shall be released of all obligations under the bond if any of the following conditions apply:

(A) The clerk fails to mail the notice of forfeiture in accordance with this section within 30 days after the entry of the forfeiture.

(B) The clerk fails to mail the notice of forfeiture to the surety at the address printed on the bond.

(C) The clerk fails to mail a copy of the notice of forfeiture to the bail agent at the address shown on the bond.

(c) (1) If the defendant appears either voluntarily or in custody after surrender or arrest in court within 180 days of the date of forfeiture or within 180 days of the date of mailing of the notice if the notice is required under subdivision (b), the court shall, on its own motion at the time the defendant first appears in court on the case in which the forfeiture was entered, direct the order of forfeiture to be vacated and the bond exonerated. If the court fails to so act on its own motion, then the surety’s or depositor’s obligations under the bond shall be immediately vacated and the bond exonerated. An order vacating the forfeiture and exonerating the bond may be made on terms that are just and do not exceed the terms imposed in similar situations with respect to other forms of pretrial release.

(2) If, within the county where the case is located, the defendant is surrendered to custody by the bail or is
 arrested in the underlying case within the 180-day period, and is subsequently released from custody prior to an appearance in court, the court shall, on its own motion, direct the order of forfeiture to be vacated and the bond exonerated. If the court fails to so act on its own motion, then the surety’s or depositor’s obligations under the bond shall be immediately vacated and the bond exonerated. An order vacating the forfeiture and exonerating the bond may be made on terms that are just and do not exceed the terms imposed in similar situations with respect to other forms of pretrial release.

(3) If, outside the county where the case is located, the defendant is surrendered to custody by the bail or is arrested in the underlying case within the 180-day period, the court shall vacate the forfeiture and exonerate the bail.

(4) In lieu of exonerating the bond, the court may order
 the bail reinstated and the defendant released on the same bond if both of the following conditions are met:

(A) The bail is given prior notice of the reinstatement.

(B) The bail has not surrendered the defendant.

(d) In the case of a permanent disability, the court shall direct the order of forfeiture to be vacated and the bail or money or property deposited as bail exonerated if, within 180 days of the date of forfeiture or within 180 days of the date of mailing of the notice, if notice is required under subdivision (b), it is made apparent to the satisfaction of the court that both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The defendant is deceased or otherwise permanently unable to appear in the court due to illness, insanity, or detention by
 military or civil authorities.

(2) The absence of the defendant is without the connivance of the bail.

(e) (1) In the case of a temporary disability, the court shall order the tolling of the 180-day period provided in this section during the period of temporary disability, provided that it appears to the satisfaction of the court that the following conditions are met:

(A) The defendant is temporarily disabled by reason of illness, insanity, or detention by military or civil authorities.

(B) Based upon the temporary disability, the defendant is unable to appear in court during the remainder of the 180-day period.

(C) The absence of the defendant is without the
 connivance of the bail.

(2) The period of the tolling shall be extended for a reasonable period of time, at the discretion of the court, after the cessation of the disability to allow for the return of the defendant to the jurisdiction of the court.

(f) In all cases where a defendant is in custody beyond the jurisdiction of the court that ordered the bail forfeited, and the prosecuting agency elects not to seek extradition after being informed of the location of the defendant, the court shall vacate the forfeiture and exonerate the bond on terms that are just and do not exceed the terms imposed in similar situations with respect to other forms of pretrial release.

(g) In all cases of forfeiture where a defendant is not in custody and is beyond the jurisdiction of the state, is temporarily detained, by the bail agent,
 in the presence of a local law enforcement officer of the jurisdiction in which the defendant is located, and is positively identified by that law enforcement officer as the wanted defendant in an affidavit signed under penalty of perjury, and the prosecuting agency elects not to seek extradition after being informed of the location of the defendant, the court shall vacate the forfeiture and exonerate the bond on terms that are just and do not exceed the terms imposed in similar situations with respect to other forms of pretrial release.

(h) In cases arising under subdivision (g), if the bail agent and the prosecuting agency agree that additional time is needed to return the defendant to the jurisdiction of the court, and the prosecuting agency agrees to the tolling of the 180-day period, the court may, on the basis of the agreement, toll the 180-day period within which to vacate the forfeiture. The court may order tolling for up to the length
 of time agreed upon by the parties.

(i) As used in this section, “arrest” includes a hold placed on the defendant in the underlying case while he or she is in custody on other charges.
